Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.340

Eligible list, and promotions therefrom—Affirmative action.

(1) The names of all officers who have passed examinations satisfactorily shall be placed on an eligible list in the order of the grade attained in the examinations. The chief, or the committee mentioned in RCW 43.43.330 at the chief's request, may determine the lowest examination grade which will qualify an officer for inclusion of his or her name on an eligible list. Examination papers shall be graded promptly and an eligible list shall be made up immediately thereafter. All officers taking an examination shall be informed of the grade earned.

(2) After an eligible list is made up all promotions shall be made from the five top names on the applicable list, and if needed to comply with affirmative action goals three additional names referred under subsection (3) of this section. Not all three additional names need be promoted at the time they are referred and they may be referred more than once. Each officer shall be informed in writing as his or her name is included in the top five on an eligible list or referred under subsection (3) of this section. No officer whose name appears within the top five on any eligible list shall be passed over for promotion more than three times.

(3) If the vacancy to be filled is identified as part of the state patrol's affirmative action goals as established under its affirmative action plan, the chief may refer for consideration up to three additional names per vacancy of individuals who are on the eligible list and who are members of one or more of the protected groups under Title VII of the 1964 Civil Rights Act and chapter 49.60 RCW, or for federal contract compliance purposes, veterans and disabled veterans as defined in the Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Act of 1974, Title 41 C.F.R., chapter 60, part 60-250.

The three additional names referred for each vacancy shall be the top three members of the protected groups designated by the chief for referral for that vacancy in accordance with the state patrol's affirmative action goals. These names shall be drawn in rank order from the remaining names of protected group members on the eligible list, after ranking by examination grade. For each vacancy, a total of three supplementary names may be referred.

(4) After having qualified for promotion hereunder an officer must pass a medical examination and must be certified as to physical fitness to perform the duties of the advanced position by one of three doctors designated by the chief of the Washington state patrol.

(5) The state patrol shall consult with the human rights commission in the development of rules pertaining to affirmative action. The state patrol shall transmit a report annually to the human rights commission which states the progress the state patrol has made in meeting affirmative action goals and timetables.

[ 1985 c 365 s 6; 1965 c 8 s 43.43.340. Prior: 1949 c 192 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 6362-61b.]